Illinois, session 104th, HB5753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2,200,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build 6Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to YouthBuild Lake County for costs 8associated with capital improvements. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.